Utah statutes.
17-23-14.   Disturbed corners -- County surveyor to be notified.

(1)  Any person who finds it necessary to disturb any established corner in the improvement of a road, or for any other cause, or finds a monument which needs rehabilitation, shall notify the county surveyor.

(2)  The county surveyor or designee shall:

(a)  reconstruct or rehabilitate the monument for the corner by lowering and witnessing the corner or placing another monument and witness over the existing monument so that the monument:

(i)  is left in a physical condition to remain as permanent a monument as is reasonably possible; and

(ii)  may be reasonably located at all times in the future; and

(b)  file the record of each reconstruction or rehabilitation under Subsection (2)(a).

